Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 18.194, judgment remedies for  a judgment of con-
viction entered in a municipal court or justice court for violating, prior to  July 1, 2015, a city
or county ordinance or state statute prohibiting  the possession of less than one ounce of
marijuana, that have not  yet expired under the provisions of ORS 18.194, expire on the ef-
fective date of this 2025 Act.
(2) If the judgment remedies for monetary obligations in  a judgment of conviction have
expired under subsection (1) of this section, a person shall be considered to have completed,
fully complied with and performed the sentence of the court  with respect to those monetary
obligations for purposes of ORS 137.225 or 475C.397 or any  other statute authorizing the
court to set aside the judgment of conviction.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House April 17, 2025
Repassed by House June 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 11, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3825 (HB 3825-B) Page 1